Illinois, session 104th, HB3154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-410 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-410 new)8    Sec. 2105-410. Received complaint report. The Department 9shall annually prepare and publicly release a report 10containing the aggregate number of complaints and the type of 11complaints the Department received under each Act that the 12Department administers.